Texas, session 891, SB23.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 74.091, Government Code, is amended by amending Subsection (b) and adding Subsections (b-1) and (b-2) to read as follows: (b)  In a county with two or more district courts the judges of those courts shall elect a district judge as local administrative district judge: (1) for a term of [not more than] two years; or (2) if the district judge's term ends before the second anniversary of the date the district judge is elected as local administrative district judge, for the remainder of the district judge's term. (b-1) The local administrative district judge may not be elected on the basis of rotation or seniority. (b-2) If a majority of the district court judges in a county cannot agree on a judge to serve as the local administrative district judge, one of the judges shall notify the regional presiding judge, and the regional presiding judge shall cast the deciding vote. A local administrative district judge elected under this subsection serves for a term set by the regional presiding judge of not more than two years. SECTION 2.  Chapter 74, Government Code, is amended by adding Subchapter D-1 to read as follows: SUBCHAPTER D-1. COURT ADMINISTRATION CONFERENCE Sec. 74.0981.  COURT ADMINISTRATION CONFERENCE. The Office of Court Administration of the Texas Judicial System shall hold an annual meeting to provide information to presiding judges of administrative regions, local administrative judges, and court administrators related to: (1)  court budgets and operational funding; (2)  court activity statistics and case-level information on the amount and character of business transacted by state trial courts; (3)  the duties of a local administrative judge; and (4)  other court administration matters. Sec. 74.0982.  REIMBURSEMENT. TheOfficeof Court Administration of the Texas Judicial System may reimburse a presiding judge of an administrative region, a local administrative judge, or a court administrator, for the expense of attending the meeting described by Section 74.0981 to the extent money is appropriated to the office for that purpose. SECTION 3.  Section 74.091, Government Code, as amended by this Act, applies only to a local administrative district judge elected on or after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.